Tennessee statutes. Title 18 Clerks Of Courts
Part 4

Vacancy in Office

18-1-401. Deputy filling vacancy.

In case of the death of any clerk of a court, the clerk's deputy holds the office until the vacancy is filled by appointment or election, as the case may be.

Code 1858, § 334 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 72); Shan., § 410; Code 1932, § 660; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-125.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 6.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority over the juvenile court system and its employees, OAG 07-004 (1/11/07).

Collateral References. 15A Am. Jur. 2d Clerks of Courts §§ 39, 40, 42.

14 C.J.S. Clerks of Courts §§ 7, 90.

Clerks of Courts
7.

18-1-402. Temporary appointment.

The several courts may fill any vacancy temporarily until an election can be had according to law.

Code 1858, § 325; Shan., § 401; mod. Code, 1932, § 651; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-126.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 6.

Cited: Graham v. England, 154 Tenn. 435, 288 S.W. 728, 1926 Tenn. LEXIS 140 (1926).